Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2608.03
Protected consumer; remove security freeze; delete record of protected consumer; when.

A consumer reporting agency may remove a security freeze for a protected consumer or delete a record of a protected consumer if the security freeze was placed or the record was created based on a material misrepresentation of fact by the protected consumer or the protected consumer’s representative.

Laws 2016, LB835, § 11.